Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.645

Release of public information—2017 c 4 (Initiative Measure No. 1501).

[(1)] Nothing in chapter 4, Laws of 2017 shall prevent the release of public information in the following circumstances:

(a) The information is released to a governmental body, including the state's area agencies on aging, and the recipient agrees to protect the confidentiality of the information;

(b) The information concerns individuals who have been accused of or disciplined for abuse, neglect, exploitation, abandonment, or other acts involving the victimization of individuals or other professional misconduct;

(c) The information is being released as part of a judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding and subject to a court's order protecting the confidentiality of the information and allowing it to be used solely in that proceeding;

(d) The information is being provided to a representative certified or recognized under RCW 41.56.080, or as necessary for the provision of fringe benefits to public employees, and the recipient agrees to protect the confidentiality of the information;

(e) The disclosure is required by federal law;

(f) The disclosure is required by a contract between the state and a third party, and the recipient agrees to protect the confidentiality of the information;

(g) The information is released to a person or entity under contract with the state to manage, administer, or provide services to vulnerable residents, or under contract with the state to engage in research or analysis about state services for vulnerable residents, and the recipient agrees to protect the confidentiality of the information; or

(h) Information about specific public employee(s) is released to a bona fide news organization that requests such information to conduct an investigation into, or report upon, the actions of such specific public employee(s).

(2) Nothing in chapter 4, Laws of 2017 shall prevent an agency from providing contact information for the purposes of RCW 74.39A.056(3) and 74.39A.250. Nothing in chapter 4, Laws of 2017 shall prevent an agency from confirming the licensing or certification status of a caregiver on an individual basis to allow consumers to ensure the licensing or certification status of an individual caregiver.

[ 2017 c 4 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 1501, approved November 8, 2016).]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 c 4 ss 8, 10, and 11 (Initiative Measure No. 1501): See note following RCW 42.56.640.

Short title—Intent—Construction—2017 c 4 (Initiative Measure No. 1501): See notes following RCW 9.35.005.